Hawaii, session 2025, HB921.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation is tasked with developing and financing low- and moderate-income housing projects and administering homeownership programs, and the policies and priorities for its housing projects are set by its board of directors. The legislature further finds that adding the chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission, or the chairperson's designee, to the corporation's board of directors provides an opportunity for the chairperson to participate in setting policies, defining uses, and establishing priorities and procedures for the development, subdivision, and construction of dwelling units in the corporation's housing projects, thereby promoting a more wholistic approach to housing needs and protecting the interests of beneficiaries of the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act of 1920, as amended. The purpose of this Act is to add the chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission, or the chairperson's designee, to the board of directors of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation. SECTION 2.  Section 201H-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§201H-3 Board; establishment, functions, duties.  (a) There is created a board of directors of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation consisting of [nine] ten members, of whom six shall be public members appointed by the governor as provided in section 26-34.  At least four of the public members shall have knowledge and expertise in public or private financing and development of affordable housing. Public members shall be appointed from each of the counties of Honolulu, Hawaii, Maui, and Kauai.  At least one public member shall represent community advocates for low-income housing, affiliated with private nonprofit organizations that serve the residents of low-income housing.  The public members of the board shall serve four-year staggered terms; provided that the initial appointments shall be as follows: (1)  Two members to be appointed for four years; (2)  Two members to be appointed for three years; and (3)  Two members to be appointed for two years. The director of business, economic development, and tourism [and the]; director of finance[,]; and chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission, or their designated representatives, and a representative of the governor's office, shall be ex officio[[],[]] voting members.  The corporation shall be headed by the board. (b)  The board of directors shall select a chairperson and vice chairperson from among its members; provided that the chairperson shall be a public member. The director of business, economic development, and tourism[,]; director of finance[,]; chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission; and [the] governor's representative shall be ineligible to serve as chairperson of the board. (c)  [Five] Six members shall constitute a quorum, whose affirmative vote shall be necessary for all actions by the corporation.  The members shall receive no compensation for services, but shall be entitled to necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their duties." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________